Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1169.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; Arizona health care cost containment system administration; graduate medical education; exemption A. In addition to any other appropriations made in fiscal year 2026-2027, the sum of $10,000,000 from the state general fund and $18,768,700 in expenditure authority are appropriated in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona health care cost containment system administration for graduate medical education programs to address this state's shortage of physicians. B. The amounts appropriated in subsection A of this section may be used for the direct and indirect costs of graduate medical education. The state general fund appropriation may supplement, but not supplant, voluntary payments made from political subdivisions for payments to hospitals that operate a graduate medical education program. The Arizona health care cost containment system administration may use the amounts appropriated in subsection A of this section for start-up costs related to the development of a new residency program. C. The appropriations made in subsection A of this section are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.